District of Columbia statutes.
16-2325

Support of committed child.

Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in any agency or individual other than the child’s parent, after due notice to the parent or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child and after hearing, the Division may, at the dispositional hearing or thereafter, order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay, in such manner as the Division may direct, a reasonable sum that will cover in whole or in part the support and treatment of the child after the decree is entered. If the parent or other legally obligated person wilfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the Division may proceed against him for contempt, or the order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341

History

1981 Ed., § 16-2325.
1973 Ed., § 16-2325.

Prior Codifications